Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2992YC (3) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 34A.2, subsection 17, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 17. âNext generation 911 network service providerâ âNext 3 generation 911 core service providerâ means a vendor or 4 vendors selected by the department of homeland security and 5 emergency management to provide next generation 911 network 6 functionality. 7 Sec. 2. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 8 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 The amount allocated under this paragraph âbâ shall be sixty 11 fifty-five percent of the total amount of surcharge generated 12 per calendar quarter allocated as follows: 13 Sec. 3. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 14 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 15 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (2), 16 the amount allocated under this paragraph âbâ shall be fifty 17 percent until June 30, 2029. This subparagraph is repealed 18 upon completion of phase 1 and phase 2 of the next generation 19 911 transition as described in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J. 20 The department shall notify the Iowa Code editor upon the 21 occurrence of this condition. 22 Sec. 4. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph d, 23 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 (1) The program manager shall reimburse next generation 911 25 network core service providers, 911 call processing equipment 26 providers, and 911 call transport providers , and third-party 27 911 automatic location identification database providers on 28 a calendar quarterly basis for the costs of maintaining and 29 upgrading the next generation 911 network functionality, 911 30 call processing equipment, and 911 call transport from the 31 next generation 911 network to public safety answering points 32 and from the wireless originating service provider network to 33 the next generation 911 network , and the automatic location 34 identification database . 35 -1- LSB 2992YC (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 6 H.F. _____ Sec. 5. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph f, 1 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 2 amended by striking the subparagraph division. 3 Sec. 6. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph f, 4 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (c), Code 2025, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 (c) The Starting July 1, 2029, from one-half of the amount 7 of operating surplus revenue available in a given year, the 8 program manager shall allocate an equal amount of moneys 9 equally to each public safety answering point for costs 10 related to the receipt and disposition of 911 calls, including 11 hardware and software for the next generation 911 network and 12 local costs related to accessing the stateâs interoperable 13 communications system. 14 Sec. 7. Section 34A.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 34A.8 Local exchange service information ââ penalty. 17 1. A local exchange service provider shall furnish to 18 the next generation 911 network core service provider, 19 designated by the department of homeland security and 20 emergency management, all names, addresses, and telephone 21 number information concerning its subscribers which that 22 will be served by the next generation 911 network and shall 23 periodically update the local exchange service information. 24 The 911 service provider shall furnish the addresses 25 and telephone number information received from the local 26 exchange service provider to the director for use in the 27 mass notification and emergency messaging system as defined 28 in section 29C.2 . The local exchange service provider shall 29 receive as compensation for the provision of local exchange 30 service information charges according to its tariffs on file 31 with and approved by the Iowa utilities commission. The tariff 32 charges shall be the same whether or not the local exchange 33 service provider is designated as the next generation 911 34 network core service provider by the department of homeland 35 -2- LSB 2992YC (3) 91 sb/js 2/ 6 H.F. _____ security and emergency management. 1 2. a. Subscriber information remains the property of the 2 local exchange service provider. 3 b. The director, program manager, joint 911 service board, 4 local emergency management commission established pursuant to 5 section 29C.9 , the designated next generation 911 network core 6 service provider, and the public safety answering point, and 7 their agents, employees, and assigns , shall use local exchange 8 service information provided by the local exchange service 9 provider solely for the purposes of providing 911 emergency 10 telephone service or providing related mass notification and 11 emergency messaging services as described in section 29C.17A 12 utilizing only the subscriberâs information, and local exchange 13 service information shall otherwise be kept confidential. 14 A person who violates this paragraph is guilty of a simple 15 misdemeanor. 16 c. This chapter does not require a local exchange service 17 provider to sell or provide its subscriber names, addresses, 18 or telephone number information to any person other than the 19 designated next generation 911 network core service provider. 20 Sec. 8. PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT STUDY. The department 21 of homeland security and emergency management shall study and 22 make recommendations to the general assembly by January 1, 23 2026, regarding the following topics: 24 1. The concept of public safety answering point managed 25 service where one or more public safety answering points could 26 enter into an agreement with another public safety answering 27 point or joint service board for the sharing of management, 28 staffing, policies and procedures, and equipment and systems. 29 2. When the managed public safety answering point could 30 operate at less than every hour of every day as needed while 31 calls for the service area are answered by the managing public 32 safety answering point. 33 3. Recommendations for funding arrangements and terminology 34 for the managed public safety answering point and managing 35 -3- LSB 2992YC (3) 91 sb/js 3/ 6 H.F. _____ public safety answering point. 1 4. Identification of technical and operational 2 considerations for public safety answering points entering into 3 an agreement. 4 5. Identification of points where consolidation of systems 5 and equipment are feasible. 6 Sec. 9. TRANSITION PROVISIONS. 7 1. It is the intent of this Act to implement the 8 requirements of 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J, to facilitate the 9 transition to next generation 911 by originating service 10 providers. 11 2. To further the development of the next generation 911 12 network in the state, the department of homeland security 13 and emergency management is directed to work with the Iowa 14 communications network to procure and implement new session 15 initiation protocol call control and routing technology 16 for ingress by local exchange providers in a fashion that 17 ensures modernization, redundancy, and resiliency of the next 18 generation 911 network. Upon completion, the department of 19 homeland security and emergency management shall notify the 20 current legacy 911 selective router provider to decommission 21 the existing legacy 911 selective routers. 22 3. Beginning when a valid phase 1 request is implemented 23 as described in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J, the responsibility 24 to fund wireline cost recovery shall follow the procedures set 25 forth in 47 C.F.R. pt. 9, subpt. J. 26